Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Chapter 1
General Provisions, Definitions and Probate Jurisdiction of Court

§ 15-1-107. Evidence as to death or status.

In proceedings under this code the rules of evidence in courts of general jurisdiction including any relating to simultaneous deaths, are applicable unless specifically displaced by this code. In addition, the following rules relating to determination of death and status are applicable:

A certified or authenticated copy of a death certificate purporting to be issued by an official or agency of the place where the death purportedly occurred is prima facie proof of the fact, place, date and time of death and the identity of the decedent;

A certified or authenticated copy of any record or report of a governmental agency, domestic or foreign, that a person is missing, detained, dead, or alive is prima facie evidence of the status and of the dates, circumstances and places disclosed by the record or report;

A person who is absent for a continuous period of five (5) years, during which he has not been heard from, and whose absence is not satisfactorily explained after diligent search or inquiry is presumed to be dead. His death is presumed to have occurred at the end of the period unless there is sufficient evidence for determining that death occurred earlier.

§ 15-1-108. Acts by holder of general power.

For the purpose of granting consent or approval with regard to the acts or accounts of a personal representative or trustee, including relief from liability or penalty for failure to post bond, to register a trust, or to perform other duties, and for purposes of consenting to modification or termination of a trust or to deviation from its terms, the sole holder or all coholders of a presently exercisable general power of appointment, including one (1) in the form of a power of amendment or revocation, are deemed to act for beneficiaries to the extent their interests (as objects, takers in default, or otherwise) are subject to the power.

§ 15-1-109. Satisfaction of pecuniary devises or transfers by distribution in kind.

Whenever a personal representative or a trustee satisfies a pecuniary devise or transfer in trust by a distribution in kind with assets at their value for federal estate tax purposes, such fiduciary, in order to implement such a devise or transfer in trust, must, unless the governing instrument provides otherwise, distribute assets, including cash, fairly representative of appreciation or depreciation in all of the property so available for distribution in satisfaction of such pecuniary devise or transfer.

[(2)](b) Subsection (1) of this section is not intended to imply that the present law of this state, relating to selection of assets by fiduciaries in the circumstances herein described, has been otherwise than as set forth herein, but is a statement of the fiduciary principles applicable to such fiduciaries.